Wisconsin, session 2025, AB603.
do enact as follows:AB603,13Section 1. 70.05 (4j) of the statutes is created to read:AB603,2,2470.05 (4j) Not less than 7 days before a taxation district assessor enters upon 5real property for purposes of conducting an assessment under this chapter, the 1taxation district shall provide written notice of the entry to the owner of the 2property.AB603,2,33